Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3707
Corporations; violations; penalties.

Any corporation described in section 76-3706 violating such section shall be construed and held to be a nonresident alien and within the provisions of the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act applicable to nonresident aliens. Any such domestic corporation violating section 76-3706 shall forfeit its charter and be dissolved. Any such foreign corporation violating section 76-3706 shall forfeit its right to do business in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1921, c. 142, § 1, p. 608;

C.S.1922, § 5687;

C.S.1929, § 76-502;

Laws 1939, c. 97, § 1, p. 417;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-502;

R.S.1943, § 76-407;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 76-407;

Laws 2024, LB1301, § 10.